Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.030

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions of certain systems, administrators, and committees to department of retirement systems.

(1) As soon as possible but not more than one hundred and eighty days after March 19, 1976, there is transferred to the department of retirement systems, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all powers, duties, and functions of:

(a) The Washington public employees' retirement system;

(b) The Washington state teachers' retirement system;

(c) The Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system;

(d) The Washington state patrol retirement system;

(e) The Washington judicial retirement system; and

(f) The state treasurer with respect to the administration of the judges' retirement fund imposed pursuant to chapter 2.12 RCW.

(2) On July 1, 1996, there is transferred to the department all powers, duties, and functions of the deferred compensation committee.

(3) The department shall administer chapter 41.34 RCW.

(4) The department shall administer the Washington school employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(5) The department shall administer the Washington public safety employees' retirement system created under chapter 41.37 RCW.

(6) The department shall administer the collection of employer contributions and initial prefunding of the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefits, also referred to as the annuity or retirement income plans created under chapter 28B.10 RCW.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 20; 2004 c 242 s 42; 1998 c 341 s 501; 1995 c 239 s 316; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.